Hawaii statutes.
[§231-9.5] Assessment of additional taxes
of corporations or partnerships. Additional taxes of a corporation or
partnership shall be assessed to it under its corporate or firm name. [L 1989,
c 14, §1(2)]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next